Maryland, session 2026, SB0520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0520*

SENATE BILL 520
Article – Education
5–104.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of a county charter that places a limit
on that county’s property tax rate or revenues and subject to paragraph (2) of this
subsection, a county governing body may set a property tax rate that is higher than the
rate authorized under the county’s charter or collect more property tax revenues than the
revenues authorized under the county’s charter for the [sole] purpose of funding the
approved budget of the county board, including any payments by the county governing body
on behalf of the county board to the Teachers’ Pension System and the Teachers’ Retirement
System.
(2) If the county governing body sets a county property tax rate that is
greater than the rate authorized under the county’s charter or collects more property tax
revenues than the revenues authorized under the county’s charter, the county:
(i) May not reduce funding provided to the county board from any
other local revenue source below the funding level in the current county budget; and
(ii) [Shall] EXCEPT FOR PROPERTY TAX REVENUES COLLECTED
FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING A COUNTY’S PUBLIC SAFETY BUDGET IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 16–109.1 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, SHALL
appropriate to the county board all property tax revenues exceeding the amount that would
have been available if the county charter limitation had applied.
(3) On or before December 31 of any year in which a county sets a property
tax rate as provided in this subsection, the county shall report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly, on the
property tax rate set, the additional amount of revenues generated, and the appropriation
of the additional revenues.
Article – Local Government
16–109.1.
(A) (1) THIS SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THIS
SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO CHARTER COUNTIES.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF A COUNTY CHARTER THAT
PLACES A LIMIT ON THAT COUNTY’S PROPERTY TAX RATE OR REVENUES, THE
COUNTY COUNCIL OF A CHARTER COUNTY MAY SET BY SIMPLE MAJORITY VOTE OF
ITS MEMBERS THEN SERVING A PROPERTY TAX RATE THAT IS HIGHER THAN THE

SENATE BILL 520 3
RATE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE COUNTY’S CHARTER OR COLLECT MORE PROPERTY
TAX REVENUES THAN THE REVENUES AUTHORIZED UNDER THE COUNTY’S CHARTER
FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING THE APPROVED PUBLIC SAFETY BUDGET OF THE
COUNTY.
(C) IF A COUNTY COUNCIL SETS A COUNTY PROPERTY TAX RATE THAT IS
GREATER THAN THE RATE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE COUNTY’S CHARTER OR
COLLECTS MORE PROPERTY TAX REVENUES THAN THE REVENUES AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE COUNTY’S CHARTER, EXCEPT FOR PROPERTY TAX REVENUES
COLLECTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING A COUNTY’S APPROVED BUDGET OF A
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–104 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE, THE COUNTY SHALL APPROPRIATE TO THE PUBLIC SAFETY BUDGET ALL
PROPERTY TAX REVENUES EXCEEDING THE AMOUNT THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN
AVAILABLE IF THE COUNTY CHARTER LIMITATION HAD APPLIED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.